Class  N/S14.foma
### Sinhala14.foma ###

# Vowels
define A [ ​බ  ො];

define C [ ​ී];
define B [ ව ු |ව ් ව ෙ ම ි | ව ු ව ෙ ම ු |​ ව ් ව ෙ ​හ ි |​ ව ් ව ෙ ​හ ු |​ ව ් ව ා ය | ​ව ් ව ේ ය |​ව ් ව ෝ ය]; 
define D [ ​ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා ];

read lexc SinhalaCN.lexc
define Lexicon;

######### Rewrite rules

define PClass1        [​ ො]  ->  ි || A _   "^" B ;
define PClass2        [ ො]  ->  0 || A _   "^" C ;
define PClass3        [ ො]  ->  ී || A _   "^" D ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassFifGrammar 	Lexicon            .o.
                        PClass1          .o.
                        PClass2          .o.
                        PClass3          .o.
               	        Cleanup;

regex ClassFifGrammar;
